California statutes. Education Code
(2) Grants shall be awarded in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each academic year if the participant is enrolled at least one-half time in a two-year institution.

(3) Participants may renew their awards for a maximum of one additional year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69625.

(a) In order to accomplish the purposes set forth in this article, commencing January 1, 1998, the Controller, the State Department of Education, the State Department of Social Services, or any other state agency receiving funds from the Child Care Development Block Grant Act of 1990 (P.L. 97-35) shall make these funds available to the Student Aid Commission for this program only to the extent this program is incorporated into, and approved in, the state plan established pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 658E of Subchapter C as contained in Section 5082 of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-508).

(b) For the purpose of implementing this article, the State Department of Education or designated state agency shall enter into an interagency agreement with the Student Aid Commission to allocate federal funds received annually for purposes of this program and to include funds for the administrative costs. 

(c) On or before January 1, 1999, and each year thereafter, the Student Aid Commission shall report to the State Department of Education or designated state agency regarding the federal funding level required to award 100 new grants and all of the renewal grants annually. The State Department of Education or designated state agency shall take these amounts into consideration when developing the state plan referenced in subdivision (a). The State Department of Education or designated state agency shall notify the Student Aid Commission of any revision to the federal funding level as reflected in changes to the Child Care and Development Block Grant State Plan.

(d) This program is contingent upon the receipt of federal funds for the childcare and development block grant for the purposes of implementing this program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 659, Sec. 1.   Effective September 18, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

69626.

(a) The Student Aid Commission shall administer the Child Development Teacher and Supervisor Grant Program. This includes determining the application procedures and the selection criteria for grant awards.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Student Aid Commission consult with the Child Development Division of the California Department of Education, postsecondary educational institutions, and child care and development representatives of statewide organizations regarding the development of the program, including the program requirements and selection criteria.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69627.

Notwithstanding Section 7550.5 of the Government Code, the Student Aid Commission shall report to the Governor and the Legislature by January 1, 2001, on the Child Development Teacher and Supervisor Grant Program to assess the following:

(a) The number of applicants annually.

(b) The number of participants annually.

(c) The rate of compliance with academic and employment requirements.

(d) Participating postsecondary educational institutions.

(e) Needs assessment for program growth based on the eligible pool of applicants.

(f) Participation and success rates for each permit.

(g) The amount of grant funds awarded each year, by institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69628.

This article shall not be implemented unless and until federal funds are made available for the purposes of implementing this article in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 69625.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services [69640. - 69656.]

69640.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California Community Colleges recognize the need and accept the responsibility for extending the opportunities for community college education to all who may profit from that education regardless of economic, social, and educational status. It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature in establishing the Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services (EOPS) to encourage local community colleges to establish and implement programs directed to identifying those students affected by language, social, and economic handicaps, to increase the number of eligible EOPS students served, and to assist those students to achieve their educational objectives and goals, including, but not necessarily limited to, obtaining job skills, occupational certificates, or associate degrees, and transferring to four-year institutions.

(b) The rules and regulations of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall be consistent with this article. The operation of EOPS, as well as these rules and regulations, shall be consistent with all of the following goals:

(1) To increase the number and percentage of students enrolled in community colleges who are affected by language, social, and economic disadvantages, consistent with state and local matriculation policies.

(2) To increase the number and percentage of EOPS students who successfully complete their chosen educational objectives.

(3) To increase the number and percentage of EOPS students who are successfully placed into career employment.

(4) To increase the number and percentage of EOPS students who transfer to four-year institutions following completion of the related educational programs at community colleges.

(5) To strive to assist community colleges to meet student and employee affirmative action objectives.

(6) To improve the delivery of programs and services to the disadvantaged.

(c) The Legislature further intends that EOPS shall not be viewed as the only means of providing services to nontraditional and disadvantaged students or of meeting student and employee affirmative action objectives.

(d) The Legislature finds that the establishment and development of extended opportunity programs and services are essential to the conservation and development of the cultural, social, economic, intellectual, and vocational resources of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 134.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

69641.

The Extended Opportunity Programs and Services (EOPS) provided by a community college district shall supplement the regular educational programs of the community college district to encourage the enrollment of students handicapped by language, social, and economic disadvantages, and to facilitate the successful completion of their educational goals and objectives. EOPS shall be provided by certificated directors and instructors, as well as by counselors and other support staff approved by the governing board of the community college district. Participation in an extended opportunity program or service shall not preclude participation in any other program offered by the community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 247.)
-------------------------------------------

69641.5.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall consider adopting regulations which include all of the following objectives:

(a) That the Extended Opportunity Programs and Services provided by a community college shall include, but not be limited to, staff qualified to counsel all EOPS students regarding their individual educational objectives and the specific academic or vocational training program necessary to achieve those objectives, and that each EOPS student receives that counseling upon his or her initial enrollment in the community college, and at least every six months thereafter.

(b) That in assisting all EOPS students to identify their educational objectives, the Extended Opportunity Programs and Services provided by a community college identifies those students who want to transfer to a four-year institution, and those who have the potential to transfer successfully, and that the EOPS director at each community college disseminates the names and addresses of these potential transfer students to admissions staff at public universities throughout the state at least once a year.

(c) That the EOPS director at each community college shall work with other community college staff to encourage all interested EOPS students to enroll in existing community college classes designed to develop skills necessary for successful study at a university, including, but not limited to, time management, research and study skills, classroom note-taking skills, and writing skills, and that these classes be developed if they are not already established.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 248.)
-------------------------------------------

69642.

Definitions:

(a) “Extended opportunity program” means a special program or method of instruction designed to facilitate the language, educational, or social development of a student and increase his or her potential for success in the college.

(b) “Extended opportunity services” means a program of assistance designed to aid students with socioeconomic handicaps to permit them to enroll in and participate in the educational activities of the college, and to progress toward completing their educational goals and objectives, including, but not limited to, graduation from college.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 249.)
-------------------------------------------

69643.

(a) There is in the state government the Advisory Committee on Extended Opportunity Programs and Services. It shall be comprised of nine members appointed by the board, two members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and two members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. The nine members appointed by the board shall serve for four-year terms, except the first term of each shall be determined by lot at the first meeting of the board. Three shall serve for four years, three shall serve for three years, and three shall serve for two years. The two members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and the two members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules shall serve at the pleasure of the respective appointing powers. 

(b) The chairperson and vice chairperson of the committee shall be designated by the board. 

(c) The members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in performing their duties and responsibilities. 

(d) The committee shall serve as an advisory body to the board, shall formulate and present policy recommendations as it determines will effect statewide establishment and conduct of community college programs of extended opportunities and services, shall review annually and report to the board the progress made under this article with the California Community Colleges toward the extension of educational opportunities for all students who may profit from instruction, and make other recommendations to implement this article. The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall be executive secretary of the committee, shall report to the board on the actions of the committee, and, at the recommendation of the committee and its direction, shall make recommendations to the board pursuant to this article. 

(e) All meetings of the committee shall be open and public, and all persons shall be permitted to attend any meeting of the committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1038, Sec. 1.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

69648.

By January 1, 1986, the board shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this article, including rules and regulations which do all of the following:

(a) Prescribe the procedure by which a district shall identify a student eligible for extended opportunity programs or services on the basis of the student’s language, social, or economic disadvantages.

(b) Establish minimum standards for the establishment and conduct of extended opportunity programs and services. The standards may include, but shall not be limited to, guidelines for all of the following:

(1) The provision of staffing and program management.

(2) The establishment of a documentation and data collection system.

(3) The establishment of an EOPS advisory committee.

(4) The provision of recruitment and outreach services.

(5) The provision of cognitive and noncognitive assessment, advising, and orientation services.

(6) The provision of college registration.

(7) The provision of basic skills instruction, seminars, and tutorial assistance.

(8) The provision of counseling and retention services.

(9) The provision of transfer services.

(10) The provision of direct aid.

(11) The establishment of objectives to achieve the goals specified in Section 69640, and objectives to be applied in implementing extended opportunity programs and services.

(c) Subject to approval of the chancellor, establish procedures for the review and evaluation of the districts’ extended opportunity programs and services. 

(d) Require the submission of the reports by districts that will permit the evaluation of the program and services offered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

69648.5.

The board of governors may use up to 1 percent of the funds appropriated for the EOPS program by the annual Budget Act to monitor program activities and to conduct the evaluation of EOPS offered by districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

69649.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may, with the approval of the board, establish an extended opportunity program.

Except as provided in subdivision (b), in order to be eligible to receive state funding, the program shall meet the minimum standards established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69648.

(b) The board of governors may waive any or all of the minimum standards established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69648 if the board of governors determines that unusual circumstances which merit a waiver exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

69650.

The governing board of a community college district may, with the approval of the board, establish extended opportunity services. Such services may include, but need not be limited to:

(a) Loans or grants to meet living costs or a portion thereof.

(b) Loans or grants to meet the cost of student fees.

(c) Loans or grants to meet cost of transportation between home and college. 

(d) The provision of scholarships.

(e) Work-experience programs.

(f) Job placement programs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

69651.

The governing board of a community college district shall not use any funds received from the state for the operation and administration of extended opportunity programs and services to supplant district resources, programs, or services authorized by Sections 69649 and 69650. The governing board may use those funds to meet the matching requirements to receive federal funds, or funds granted by nonprofit foundations, designated for the same purposes, for extended opportunity programs and services, as defined by Section 69641.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1178, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

69652.

The governing board of a community college district may apply to the board for an allowance to meet all or a portion of the cost of establishing and operating extended opportunity programs or services authorized by this article. The application shall contain a detailed plan or plans for use of the allowance. The plan or plans shall be submitted in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board. The board may also adopt rules and regulations relating to the form and content of applications and procedures for review, evaluation, and approval thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

69653.

Applications shall be subject to the approval of the board. Upon approval by the board, it shall certify an apportionment or apportionments to the Controller. The Controller shall draw warrants on the State Treasury in the amounts certified in favor of the governing board of the community college district which has jurisdiction over the applicant district in accordance with a schedule of payments established by the board and approved by the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 260.   Operative January 1, 1992, by Sec. 709 of Ch. 1372.)
-------------------------------------------

69654.

The board shall review the need for state funds to carry out the purposes of this chapter and shall include an estimate of such need in its budget for each year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

69655.

(a) Pursuant to Section 69648, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall determine the elements of a statewide data base for the Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services, which shall be used for periodic evaluation of the programs and services. The data base shall include all information necessary to demonstrate the statewide progress towards achieving the program goals identified in Section 69640, and program objectives adopted pursuant to Section 69648 including, but not limited to, all of the following: 

(1) The annual number of extended opportunity programs and services (EOPS) students and non-EOPS students who complete degree or certificate programs, transfer programs, or other programs, as determined by state and local matriculation policies.

(2) The annual number of EOPS and non-EOPS students who transfer to institutions which award the baccalaureate degree. In implementing this paragraph, the chancellor shall work in cooperation with the California Postsecondary Education Commission, the President of the University of California, the Chancellor of the California State University, and the Association of Independent Colleges and Universities to establish methods for obtaining the necessary data.

(3) The annual number of EOPS and non-EOPS students completing occupational programs who find career employment.

In implementing this paragraph, the chancellor shall integrate the data collection with existing data collection requirements pertaining to vocational education.

(b) Beginning in January 1987, the chancellor shall annually report to the Legislature regarding the number of students served by the Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services and the number of EOPS students who achieve their educational objectives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1455, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

69656.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State University and the University of California provide fee waivers for admissions applications for all EOPS transfer students who provide waiver forms signed by a community college EOPS director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1586, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Golden State Education and Training Grant Program Act [69670. - 69671.]

69670.

(a) This article shall be known as the Golden State Education and Training Grant Program Act.

(b) For purposes of this article:

(1) “Commission” means the Student Aid Commission.

(2) “Grant” means a Golden State Education and Training Grant awarded pursuant to this article.

(3) “Institution of higher education” means a campus or extension center of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges.

(4) “Program” means the Golden State
 Education and Training Grant Program established by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 30.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

69671.

(a) From any funds appropriated by the annual Budget Act or another statute for purposes of this article, the commission shall administer the program, which is hereby established. Under this program, the commission shall make available one-time grants to California resident workers who have been displaced from their employment due to the COVID-19 pandemic, are not already accessing an educational or training program, can demonstrate a financial need by meeting the income and asset qualifications, established pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 69432.7, to be eligible for a Cal Grant A award, and agree to use the grant funds for any of the following purposes:

(1) To access an educational program or qualified training program at an
 institution of higher education.

(2) To obtain training from a provider that is included on the state’s Eligible Training Provider List.

(b) (1) The commission shall determine the amount of each grant award so that no grant awarded under this article is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and no award exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). The commission shall consider individual applicant financial need and educational or training program costs in determining individual award amounts. The commission shall prioritize available grants to participants with incomes that are the greatest percentage less than the average monthly family or individual income in calendar years 2018 and 2019 needed to meet the average living wage in the participant’s California county or metropolitan statistical area of the state, as computed by the living wage
 calculation developed by the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.

(2) The commission shall allocate at least one-half of the funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act or another statute for purposes of this article to provide grants to eligible individuals who are caring for at least one dependent child under 18 years of age in the calendar year of the application.

(c) In awarding grants to individuals pursuant to this article, the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop an application for prospective individuals to request a grant. In developing the application, the commission shall consider if the application process can be integrated within the application process for the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and the California Dream Act application.

(2) Verify that an applicant was displaced from the applicant’s employment due to the COVID-19 pandemic and meets the income and asset criteria, established pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 69432.7, to be eligible for a Cal Grant A award.

(3) Require an applicant to self-certify that they have been unable to obtain employment that provides an average monthly wage that is equal to, or greater than, the average monthly wage received from their employment before the COVID-19 pandemic.

(4) Verify that the applicant was not enrolled in a training program, college, or university at the time the applicant was displaced from the applicant’s employment.

(5) Ensure that, if a student opts to attend an institution of higher education, the student’s grant
 funding is used to supplement and not supplant other sources of grant financial aid.

(d) Grants allocated by the commission under this article shall be used to do either of the following:

(1) Support the costs to access an educational program offered by an institution of higher education.

(2) Obtain training from a provider that is included on the state’s Eligible Training Provider List, and that has a demonstrated track record of having the majority of its participants obtain employment that pays at least a living wage, as calculated by the Massachusetts Institute of Technology within one calendar year of program completion.

(e) An eligible individual may request and receive no more than one grant under this article.

(f) To the extent practicable, applicants determined to be eligible for a grant under this article shall have their grants provided directly to the institution of higher education of their choosing or directly to the applicable training provider included on the state’s Eligible Training Provider List.

(g) The commission shall collaborate with institutions of higher education to facilitate the offering of these grant opportunities through campuses of those institutions. As a condition of making these grants available to individuals through institutions of higher education, those institutions shall comply with the applicable programmatic requirements of subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, and report the information necessary for the commission to complete the report required pursuant to subdivision (i). To the extent practicable, institutions of higher education shall match the grant
 awards provided to individuals enrolling in an educational program offered by the institution with any available institutional aid.

(h) The commission may adopt regulations it deems necessary for the implementation of this program. If the commission opts to adopt regulations pursuant to this subdivision, these regulations shall be adopted by December 31, 2021, and shall be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). For purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of those regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(i) No later than December 31, 2023, the commission shall report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and to the Governor on the number of grants provided to an institution of higher education on behalf of a grantee or to a training provider included on the state’s Eligible Training Provider List on behalf of a grantee.

(j) (1) The commission may use up to 1 percent of the amount appropriated for purposes of this article to support its direct costs in administering the program.

(2) Institutions of higher education administering this grant program through their campuses may use up to 1 percent of the amount allocated to their campuses for purposes of this section to support direct costs to administer the program.

(3) The commission shall provide a portion of funds not to exceed 1 percent of the amount appropriated for purposes of this article to institutions of higher education administering this grant program for purposes of promoting the program and attracting eligible applicants in their respective communities.

(k) The Legislature finds and declares, within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code, that undocumented persons shall be eligible to receive grants under this article.

(l) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate state funding in the annual Budget Act or another statute to support the provision of a grant award to any eligible resident who meets, or could meet in a future year, the requirements for exemption from nonresident tuition pursuant to subdivision (a) of
 Section 68130.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 30.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11.5. Willie L. Brown, Jr. Community Service Scholarship Program [69730. - 69732.]

69730.

There is hereby established the Willie L. Brown, Jr. Community Service Scholarship Program, the purpose of which shall be to reward pupils for volunteering to serve their communities, to address serious social and economic community needs, and to increase the tendency of youth to be involved in public service. The program shall be administered by the Student Aid Commission. Pursuant to that authority, the commission shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide information regarding the program to each school district in this state. Any public high school of this state, other than any continuation or alternative high school, may participate in the program upon request. Each participating high school shall provide adequate notice to its pupils of the availability of the scholarships authorized under this article.

(b) Establish a model scholarship application form of no more than one page in length, requiring no more than 25 data elements, and provide copies of that application form to all participating high schools. Participating high schools may use either the model form or their own scholarship application form. Scholarship funds to be awarded pursuant to this article shall be provided without regard to the requirements otherwise set forth in this chapter.

(c) Conduct periodic reviews in order to ensure that the selection of scholarship recipients is conducted in compliance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1188, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1990, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

69731.

(a) At least one scholarship under this article shall be made available each year to each high school participating in the program to award to a pupil who is enrolled in that high school. One additional scholarship shall be available each year to each participating high school for each 1,000 pupils enrolled in that school in excess of 1,000 pupils.

(b) Each participating high school shall establish and maintain a community service scholarship committee that consists of the following persons:

(1) One full-time teacher employed by the school.

(2) One employee of the school who is a classified
 employee or pupil counselor, and who has contributed to the academic or personal development of high school pupils. In the event that no person meets those qualifications, the principal of the school shall designate any other employee of the school to serve on the committee.

(3) One parent of any pupil who is enrolled in the high school but is not an applicant for a scholarship under this article.

(4) Two representatives from community organizations or agencies, as described in subdivision (c).

(c) Scholarships made available to the participating high school shall be awarded by the community service scholarship committee to pupil applicants determined by a majority vote of the membership of the committee to have made significant contributions to the community through community service. For the purposes of this
 article, “community service” means volunteer work for any nonprofit organization that meets the description set forth in paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of Title 26 of the United States Code, or for any other community service agency or organization that is nonprofit, nonpartisan, and nonsectarian, which work is performed to further purposes of education, environmental quality, health care, local, state, or federally funded public assistance, public safety crime prevention or control, transportation, recreation, housing and neighborhood improvement, rural development, conservation, child care, senior citizens’ quality of life, outdoor beautification, or any other purpose of human betterment and community improvement. In the event that the community service scholarship committee determines that the number of applicants who qualify for a scholarship under this subdivision exceeds the number of scholarships available to the high school under this article, the committee shall apply the following
 additional criteria in order to select scholarship recipients:

(1) The applicant’s financial status, including the applicant’s ability to finance a college education.

(2) The extent to which the applicant’s capacity to provide volunteer service has been limited by the applicant’s other extracurricular activities, summer or part-time employment, or responsibilities to the applicant’s family.

(3) Whether the applicant would be the first member of the applicant’s immediate family to attend an institution of higher education.

(d) Each scholarship awarded shall be for a period of one year, subject to the requirement that no scholarship funding shall be payable as to any academic term in which the recipient fails to both maintain a course load of at least six
 semester units or the equivalent and meet or exceed the institution’s standards for satisfactory academic progress. For purposes of this determination, homelessness, as defined as a “homeless individual” within the meaning of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec.
 11302(a)), or as defined as a “homeless child or youth,” as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), is an extenuating circumstance for students who are otherwise unable to meet the requirements deemed to constitute “satisfactory academic progress” at that institution that may be considered by the institution to alter or excuse compliance with those progress requirements.

(e) No later than June 15 of each year, the community service scholarship committee of each participating high school shall notify the Student Aid Commission of the names of the scholarship recipients selected by the committee, or, alternatively, that no pupil applicants were determined by the committee to qualify for a scholarship pursuant to subdivision (c). No later than August 15 of that year, the commission shall provide funding for the subsequent
 academic year for each scholarship awarded pursuant to this section, in an amount equal to the amount of the undergraduate student fees charged for that school year by the University of California, except that no such allotment shall be in an amount of less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(f) Scholarship funding provided under this article may be applied to educational costs incurred by the recipient pursuant to the applicant’s attendance at an institution of higher education. Those costs may include, but are not necessarily limited to, tuition, fees, instructional materials, and room and board.

(g) Scholarships shall be funded under this article to the extent funds are made available for that purpose.

(h) This article shall not be construed to prevent any participating high school or pupil from
 seeking private or other funding sources to supplement the amount of any scholarship or scholarships awarded under this article. Any scholarship or scholarships awarded under this article shall augment, and not supplant, student financial aid from other sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 285, Sec. 3.   (AB 2416)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

69732.

Each applicant for a scholarship under this article shall meet all of the following qualifications:

(a) Is maintaining satisfactory educational progress, as defined in Section 35160.5.

(b) Has provided volunteer service to one or more community organizations or agencies, as described in subdivision (c).

(c) Is eligible to graduate from high school in the school year in which the application is made.

(d) Intends to attend an institution of higher education in California during the subsequent school year, and to maintain a course load of at least six semester units or the equivalent.

(e) Is a resident of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1188, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1990, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Public Interest Attorney Loan Repayment Program [69740. - 69746.5.]

69740.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this section govern the construction of this article.

(a) “Commission” means the Student Aid Commission.

(b) “Eligible education and training programs” means education and training programs approved by the commission that lead to eligibility for a license to practice law as a licensed attorney.

(c) “Eligible expenses” means reasonable expenses associated with the costs of acquiring an education such as tuition, books, equipment, fees, room and board, and other expenses determined by the commission.

(d) “Eligible participant” means a licensed attorney who has been admitted to the program and is a resident of this state and who can provide proof of residency in this state.

(e) “Licensed attorney” means an attorney who resides in this state who has successfully passed the California bar examination and has been admitted to practice in this state or has otherwise been licensed to practice law in this state by the State Bar of California.

(f) “Loan repayment” means a loan that is paid in full or in part if the participant renders legal services in this state in a public interest area of the law.

(g) “Participant” means a licensed attorney who has been admitted to the program and has commenced practice as a licensed attorney in this state in a public interest area of the law.

(h) “Program” means the Public Interest Attorney Loan Repayment Program.

(i) “Public interest area of the law” means those areas of the law determined by the commission, in consultation with the advisory committee, to serve the public interest, including, but not necessarily limited to, providing direct legal service at a local (1) legal services organization, (2) prosecuting attorney’s office, (3) child support agency office, or (4) criminal public defender’s office. For the purposes of this article, a “legal services organization” is a legal services provider in California that serves a clientele over 70 percent of whom are low-income persons according to applicable federal income guidelines.

(j) “Required service obligation” means an obligation by the participant to provide legal services in this state in a public interest area of the law as established pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 881, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

69741.

The Public Interest Attorney Loan Repayment Program is established for licensed attorneys who practice or agree to practice in public interest areas of the law in this state. The program shall be administered by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 881, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

69741.5.

(a) Participants in this program are eligible for a maximum of eleven thousand dollars ($11,000) in loan assistance for four years, as follows:

(1) For the first year, two thousand dollars ($2,000) in loan repayment assistance.

(2) For the second, third, and fourth years, three thousand dollars ($3,000) in loan repayment assistance for each year.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any fiscal year, the commission shall award no more than the number of warrants that are authorized in the annual Budget Act for that fiscal year for the assumption of loans pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 79, Sec. 28.   Effective July 19, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

69742.
